Vermont statutes. Title 29 Public Property and Supplies
Subchapter 5. Permits, Reports, and Notices

§ 541.
Drilling permits.

No person shall commence drilling a well for oil or gas exploration, development, production, or related purposes without a permit issued by the Board.

An application for a permit shall be filed with the Board in the manner and form prescribed by rule, and shall include at least the following:

the applicant’s name, address, address of each applicant’s offices within the State and, where the applicant is not a natural person, the form, date, and place of formation of the applicant;

a plat prepared by a competent engineer or certified professional surveyor showing the county, town, and tract of land on which the proposed well is to be located and an exact location of the well site established in accordance with the Vermont coordinate system;

the proposed angle, direction, and depth of the well if the well is to be substantially deviated from a vertical course;

a fee, based on the depth to be drilled, as prescribed by rule of the Board;

a permit under 10 V.S.A. chapter 151 (Act 250). In the case of an application for a permit to drill on lands leased from the State, the State land manager shall be a co-applicant with the lessee for the permit; provided, however, that the Board shall be considered a party for purposes of any hearing or appeal.

The Board may conduct investigations it considers necessary to verify information contained in the application. The applicant shall grant the Board, its employees, and agents permission to enter upon the site for this purpose.

Within 30 days of the granting of a drilling permit by the Board, the permit shall be filed by the applicant for recording in the land records of the town in which the proposed well is to be located. Failure to comply with this section shall be cause for revocation of a drilling permit.

Drilling permits shall expire one year after issuance unless drilling operations are commenced within such time and prosecuted with due diligence. At least 15 days prior to the commencement of drilling operations, every person granted permission to drill a well pursuant to this section shall give written notice by certified mail to the Board, local agencies, and the surface landowner affected.

HISTORY:

Added

1981, No. 240

(Adj. Sess.), § 2, eff. April 28, 1982.

§ 542.
Drilling reports.

It shall be the duty of the well operator to keep a geologic log prepared by a competent petroleum geologist showing the character, thickness, and depth of the formations encountered in the drilling of a well and the depths at which all oil, gas, water, or other substances are encountered.
The log shall show whether the well is productive of oil, gas, water, or other substances, the quantities thereof, and the initial pressure and production measured over a period of at least 48 hours.
A copy of the well log shall be furnished to the Board within 30 days of the completion of the well.
Such reports shall be held confidential; provided, however, that the State Geologist shall have access to this information.

HISTORY:

Added

1981, No. 240

(Adj. Sess.), § 2, eff. April 28, 1982.

§ 543.
Reports of oil and gas operations.

The owner, lessee, agent, employee, or other person in charge of any oil and gas well within the State shall forward to the Board, in the manner and form prescribed by the rules of the Board, a report showing the character of the well, method of operation, and total production for the preceding calendar year. Such reports shall be held confidential.

The Board may conduct investigations it considers necessary to verify compliance with this section. The operator shall grant the Board, its employees, and agents permission to enter upon the site for this purpose.

Statistical bulletins based on these reports shall be compiled by the Board to show, for the State as a whole, and separately for each town, the totals of oil and gas produced, provided that, in order not to disclose the production of any one operator, no production figure shall be published that represents the production of less than three operators. If necessary to maintain confidentiality, production figures for two or more towns shall be combined.

HISTORY:

Added

1981, No. 240

(Adj. Sess.), § 2, eff. April 28, 1982.

§ 544.
Abandonment of wells.

Prior to the abandonment of any well drilled under a permit issued by the Board, it shall be the duty of the owner or operator of the well to plug it so as to completely shut off and prevent the escape of all oil, gas, salt water, or other substances that might pollute ground or surface waters.

The operator of the well shall notify the Board in writing of his or her intention to plug and abandon, identifying the well and fixing the time when the work of plugging the well will be commenced so that a representative of the Board may be present.

When plugging and restoration and reclamation of the drill site have been completed, a certificate of abandonment shall be filed in a form and manner prescribed by the Board.

If a person fails to produce and sell, or to produce for his or her own purposes, oil or gas from a completed well for a period of more than 24 months, there shall be a rebuttable presumption that the person intends to abandon the well and any well equipment situated on the premises. However, this presumption shall not arise:

concerning leases for gas storage purposes; or

where any shut-in royalty, flat rate well rental, delay rental, or other similar payment designed to keep an oil and gas lease in effect or to extend its term has been paid or tendered; or

where the failure to produce and sell is the result of any act of neglect of a third party beyond the control of the owner or operator of the well; or

when a delay in excess of 24 months occurs because of any inability to sell, deliver, or otherwise tender any oil or gas product.

HISTORY:

Added

1981, No. 240

(Adj. Sess.), § 2, eff. April 28, 1982.

§ 545.
Conveyance and acquisition of oil and gas interests.

An oil and gas interest shall be deemed to mean the interest that is created by an instrument transferring, either by grant, reservation, assignment, or otherwise, an interest of any kind in oil and gas, and other minerals if included in an interest in oil and gas.

An instrument transferring an interest in oil and gas, as described in subsection (a) of this section, shall identify the type of interest transferred in bold face type at the top of the instrument. For example:

LEASE—OIL AND GAS ONLY;

LEASE—OIL, GAS, AND OTHER MINERALS;

DEED—OIL AND GAS ONLY;

DEED—OIL, GAS, AND OTHER MINERALS.

The owner or operator of any well shall notify the Board and all royalty owners within 30 days of the sale, assignment, transfer, conveyance, or exchange by the owner or operator of such well and the land, owned or leased, upon which the well is located.

Every person who acquires the ownership or operation of any well, whether by purchase, assignment, transfer, conveyance, exchange, or otherwise shall notify the Board and all royalty owners in writing within 60 days of the acquisition.

The notice required by this section shall be given in the form and manner prescribed by the Board. The Board shall compile and maintain current records of producing wells and their ownership and location. The State Geologist shall have access to this information.

HISTORY:

Added

1981, No. 240

(Adj. Sess.), § 2, eff. April 28, 1982.